Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
341]

ENVIRONMENTAL
QUALITY CONTROL

Section

341-1 Findings and purpose

341-2 Definitions

341-3 Office of environmental quality control;

environmental center; environmental
council

341-4 Powers and duties of the director

341-5 Repealed

341-6 Functions of the environmental council

Note

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next